Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-937
Electronic monitoring device; acts prohibited; violation; penalty.

(1) A person shall not intentionally and without authority remove, destroy, alter, tamper with, damage, or circumvent the operation of an electronic monitoring device required to be worn or used by that person or another person pursuant to a court order or as a condition of parole.

(2) A violation of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) For purposes of this section, electronic monitoring device means an electronic device used to track the location of a person.

Laws 2025, LB530, § 2.